Illinois, session 104th, SB3667.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 57.11, 58.3, and 58.13 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/57.11)7    Sec. 57.11. Underground Storage Tank Fund; creation. 8    (a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a 9special fund to be known as the Underground Storage Tank Fund. 10There shall be deposited into the Underground Storage Tank 11Fund all moneys received by the Office of the State Fire 12Marshal as fees for underground storage tanks under Sections 4 13and 5 of the Gasoline Storage Act, fees pursuant to the Motor 14Fuel Tax Law, and beginning July 1, 2013, payments pursuant to 15the Use Tax Act, the Service Use Tax Act, the Service 16Occupation Tax Act, and the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. All 17amounts held in the Underground Storage Tank Fund shall be 18invested at interest by the State Treasurer. All income earned 19from the investments shall be deposited into the Underground 20Storage Tank Fund no less frequently than quarterly. In 21addition to any other transfers that may be provided for by 22law, beginning on July 1, 2018 and on the first day of each 23month thereafter during fiscal years 2019 through 2026 only,   SB3667- 2 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1the State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer 2shall transfer an amount equal to 1/12 of $10,000,000 from the 3Underground Storage Tank Fund to the General Revenue Fund. 4Moneys in the Underground Storage Tank Fund, pursuant to 5appropriation, may be used by the Agency and the Office of the 6State Fire Marshal for the following purposes:7        (1) To take action authorized under Section 57.12 to 8    recover costs under Section 57.12.9        (2) To assist in the reduction and mitigation of 10    damage caused by leaks from underground storage tanks, 11    including, but not limited to, providing alternative water 12    supplies to persons whose drinking water has become 13    contaminated as a result of those leaks.14        (3) To be used as a matching amount toward federal 15    assistance relative to the release of petroleum from 16    underground storage tanks.17        (4) For the costs of administering activities of the 18    Agency and the Office of the State Fire Marshal relative 19    to the Underground Storage Tank Fund.20        (5) For payment of costs of corrective action incurred 21    by and indemnification to operators of underground storage 22    tanks as provided in this Title.23        (6) For a total of 2 demonstration projects in amounts 24    in excess of a $10,000 deductible charge designed to 25    assess the viability of corrective action projects at 26    sites which have experienced contamination from petroleum   SB3667- 3 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1    releases. Such demonstration projects shall be conducted 2    in accordance with the provision of this Title.3        (7) Subject to appropriation, moneys in the 4    Underground Storage Tank Fund may also be used by the 5    Department of Revenue for the costs of administering its 6    activities relative to the Fund and for refunds provided 7    for in Section 13a.8 of the Motor Fuel Tax Law.8    (b) Moneys in the Underground Storage Tank Fund may, 9pursuant to appropriation, be used by the Office of the State 10Fire Marshal or the Agency to take whatever emergency action 11is necessary or appropriate to assure that the public health 12or safety is not threatened whenever there is a release or 13substantial threat of a release of petroleum from an 14underground storage tank and for the costs of administering 15its activities relative to the Underground Storage Tank Fund.16    (c) Beginning July 1, 1993, the Governor shall certify to 17the State Comptroller and State Treasurer the monthly amount 18necessary to pay debt service on State obligations issued 19pursuant to Section 6 of the General Obligation Bond Act. On 20the last day of each month, the Comptroller shall order 21transferred and the Treasurer shall transfer from the 22Underground Storage Tank Fund to the General Obligation Bond 23Retirement and Interest Fund the amount certified by the 24Governor, plus any cumulative deficiency in those transfers 25for prior months.26    (d) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Section,   SB3667- 4 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1the Underground Storage Tank Fund is not subject to 2administrative charges authorized under Section 8h of the 3State Finance Act that would in any way transfer any funds from 4the Underground Storage Tank Fund into any other fund of the 5State. 6    (e) Each fiscal year, subject to appropriation, the Agency 7may commit up to $10,000,000 of the moneys in the Underground 8Storage Tank Fund to the payment of corrective action costs 9for legacy sites that meet one or more of the following 10criteria as a result of the underground storage tank release: 11(i) the presence of free product, (ii) contamination within a 12regulated recharge area, a wellhead protection area, or the 13setback zone of a potable water supply well, (iii) 14contamination extending beyond the boundaries of the site 15where the release occurred, or (iv) such other criteria as may 16be adopted in Agency rules.17        (1) Fund moneys committed under this subsection (e) 18    shall be held in the Fund for payment of the corrective 19    action costs for which the moneys were committed.20        (2) The Agency may adopt rules governing the 21    commitment of Fund moneys under this subsection (e).22        (3) This subsection (e) does not limit the use of Fund 23    moneys at legacy sites as otherwise provided under this 24    Title.25        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (e), the term 26    "legacy site" means a site for which (i) an underground   SB3667- 5 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1    storage tank release was reported prior to January 1, 2    2005, (ii) the owner or operator has been determined 3    eligible to receive payment from the Fund for corrective 4    action costs, and (iii) the Agency did not receive any 5    applications for payment prior to January 1, 2010. 6    (f) Beginning July 1, 2013, if the amounts deposited into 7the Fund from moneys received by the Office of the State Fire 8Marshal as fees for underground storage tanks under Sections 4 9and 5 of the Gasoline Storage Act and as fees pursuant to the 10Motor Fuel Tax Law during a State fiscal year are sufficient to 11pay all claims for payment by the fund received during that 12State fiscal year, then the amount of any payments into the 13fund pursuant to the Use Tax Act, the Service Use Tax Act, the 14Service Occupation Tax Act, and the Retailers' Occupation Tax 15Act during that State fiscal year shall be deposited as 16follows: 75% thereof shall be paid into the State treasury and 1725% shall be reserved in a special account and used only for 18the transfer to the Common School Fund as part of the monthly 19transfer from the General Revenue Fund in accordance with 20Section 8a of the State Finance Act. 21    (g) Beginning July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter, 22the State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer 23shall transfer the sum of $5,000,000 from the Underground 24Storage Tank Fund to the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund. 25(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 104-2, 26eff. 6-16-25.)   SB3667- 6 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1    (415 ILCS 5/58.3)2    Sec. 58.3. Site Investigation and Remedial Activities 3Program; Brownfields Redevelopment Fund.4    (a) The General Assembly hereby establishes by this Title 5a Site Investigation and Remedial Activities Program for sites 6subject to this Title. This program shall be administered by 7the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency under this Title 8XVII and rules adopted by the Illinois Pollution Control 9Board. 10    (b) (1) The General Assembly hereby creates within the 11    State Treasury a special fund to be known as the 12    Brownfields Redevelopment Fund, consisting of 2 programs 13    to be known as the "Municipal Brownfields Redevelopment 14    Grant Program" and the "Brownfields Redevelopment Loan 15    Program", which shall be used and administered by the 16    Agency as provided in Sections 58.13 and 58.15 of this Act 17    and the rules adopted under those Sections. The 18    Brownfields Redevelopment Fund ("Fund") shall contain 19    moneys transferred from the Response Contractors 20    Indemnification Fund and other moneys made available for 21    deposit into the Fund. 22        (2) The State Treasurer, ex officio, shall be the 23    custodian of the Fund, and the Comptroller shall direct 24    payments from the Fund upon vouchers properly certified by 25    the Agency. The Treasurer shall credit to the Fund   SB3667- 7 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1    interest earned on moneys contained in the Fund. The 2    Agency shall have the authority to accept, receive, and 3    administer on behalf of the State any grants, gifts, 4    loans, reimbursements or payments for services, or other 5    moneys made available to the State from any source for 6    purposes of the Fund. Those moneys shall be deposited into 7    the Fund, unless otherwise required by the Environmental 8    Protection Act or by federal law. 9        (3) Pursuant to appropriation, all moneys in the Fund 10    shall be used by the Agency for the purposes set forth in 11    subdivision (b)(4) of this Section and Sections 58.13 and 12    58.15 of this Act and to cover the Agency's costs of 13    program development and administration under those 14    Sections. 15        (4) The Agency shall have the power to enter into 16    intergovernmental agreements with the federal government 17    or the State, or any instrumentality thereof, for purposes 18    of capitalizing the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund. Moneys 19    on deposit in the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund may be 20    used for the issuance of grants or providing additional 21    subsidization or for the creation of reserve funds or 22    pledged funds that secure the obligations of repayment of 23    loans made pursuant to Section 58.15 of this Act. For the 24    purpose of obtaining capital for deposit into the 25    Brownfields Redevelopment Fund, the Agency may also enter 26    into agreements with financial institutions and other   SB3667- 8 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1    persons for the purpose of selling loans and developing a 2    secondary market for such loans. The Agency shall have the 3    power to create and establish such reserve funds and 4    accounts as may be necessary or desirable to accomplish 5    its purposes under this subsection and to allocate its 6    available moneys into such funds and accounts. Investment 7    earnings on moneys held in the Brownfields Redevelopment 8    Fund, including any reserve fund or pledged fund, shall be 9    deposited into the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund. 10        (5) The Agency is authorized to administer funds made 11    available to the Agency under federal law, including but 12    not limited to the Small Business Liability Relief and 13    Brownfields Revitalization Act, related to brownfields 14    cleanup and reuse in accordance with that law and this 15    Title.16(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07.) 17    (415 ILCS 5/58.13)18    Sec. 58.13. Municipal Brownfields Redevelopment Grant 19Program. 20    (a) (1) The Agency shall establish and administer a 21    program of grants, to be known as the Municipal 22    Brownfields Redevelopment Grant Program, to provide 23    municipalities in Illinois with financial assistance to be 24    used for coordination of activities related to brownfields 25    redevelopment, including but not limited to identification   SB3667- 9 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1    of brownfields sites, including those sites within River 2    Edge Redevelopment Zones, site investigation and 3    determination of remediation objectives and related plans 4    and reports, development of remedial action plans, and 5    implementation of remedial action plans and remedial 6    action completion reports. The plans and reports shall be 7    developed in accordance with Title XVII of this Act. 8        (2) Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis 9    subject to availability of funding. Criteria for awarding 10    grants shall include, but shall not be limited to the 11    following: 12            (A) problem statement and needs assessment; 13            (B) community-based planning and involvement; 14            (C) implementation planning; and 15            (D) long-term benefits and sustainability. 16        (3) The Agency may give weight to geographic location 17    to enhance geographic distribution of grants across this 18    State. 19        (4) (Blank). Except for grants to municipalities with 20    designated River Edge Redevelopment Zones, grants shall be 21    limited to a maximum of $240,000, and no municipality 22    shall receive more than this amount under this Section. 23    For grants to municipalities with designated River Edge 24    Redevelopment Zones and grants to municipalities awarded 25    from funds provided under the American Recovery and 26    Reinvestment Act of 2009, grants shall be limited to a   SB3667- 10 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1    maximum of $2,000,000 and no municipality shall receive 2    more than this amount under this Section. For grants to 3    municipalities awarded from funds provided under the 4    American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, grants 5    shall be limited to a maximum of $1,000,000 and no 6    municipality shall receive more than this amount under 7    this Section. 8        (5) Except as otherwise provided by Agency rule, grant 9    Grant amounts shall not exceed 70% of the project amount, 10    with the remainder to be provided by the municipality as 11    local matching funds.12    (b) The Agency shall have the authority to enter into any 13contracts or agreements that may be necessary to carry out its 14duties or responsibilities under this Section. The Agency 15shall have the authority to adopt rules setting forth 16procedures and criteria for administering the Municipal 17Brownfields Redevelopment Grant Program. The rules adopted by 18the Agency may include but shall not be limited to the 19following: 20        (1) purposes for which grants are available; 21        (2) application periods and content of applications; 22        (3) procedures and criteria for Agency review of grant 23    applications, grant approvals and denials, and grantee 24    acceptance; 25        (4) grant payment schedules; 26        (5) grantee responsibilities for work schedules, work   SB3667- 11 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1    plans, reports, and record keeping; 2        (6) evaluation of grantee performance, including but 3    not limited to auditing and access to sites and records; 4        (7) requirements applicable to contracting and 5    subcontracting by the grantee; 6        (8) penalties for noncompliance with grant 7    requirements and conditions, including stop-work orders, 8    termination of grants, and recovery of grant funds; 9        (9) indemnification of this State and the Agency by 10    the grantee; and 11        (10) manner of compliance with the Local Government 12    Professional Services Selection Act.13    (c) Moneys in the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund may be 14used by the Agency to take whatever preventive or corrective 15action, including but not limited to removal or remedial 16action, is necessary or appropriate in response to a release 17or substantial threat of a release of:18        (1) a hazardous substance or pesticide; or19        (2) petroleum from an underground storage tank.20    The State, the Director, and any State employee shall be 21indemnified for any damages or injury arising out of or 22resulting from any action taken pursuant to this subsection 23(c) and subsection (d)(2) of Section 4 of this Act. The Agency 24has the authority to enter into such contracts and agreements 25as may be necessary, and as expeditiously as necessary, to 26carry out preventive or corrective action pursuant to this   SB3667- 12 -LRB104 19366 BDA 32814 b1subsection (c) and subsection (d)(2) of Section 4 of this Act. 2(Source: P.A. 96-45, eff. 7-15-09.)